Colorado statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Matters
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

Editor's note:

(1) This article was repealed and reenacted in 1993, and this part 1 was subsequently amended with relocations in 2003, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this part 1 prior to 2003, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume and the editor's note following the article heading. Former C.R.S. section numbers prior to 2003 are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

(2) In 1961, this article was enacted as the Uniform Reciprocal Enforcement of Support Act. It was replaced by the Revised Uniform Reciprocal Enforcement of Support Act in 1971, which repealed and reenacted the act and was in effect until 1993 when it was repealed and reenacted into the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act as it existed until 2003 when the article was amended. For the Uniform Reciprocal Enforcement of Support Act, see article 2 of chapter 43, C.R.S. 1963 (L. 61, p. 356). For the Revised Uniform Reciprocal Enforcement of Support Act, see article 2 of chapter 43, C.R.S. 1963 or article 5 of title 14, C.R.S. 1973 (L. 71, p. 515).

14-5-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Uniform Interstate Family Support Act".

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part amended with relocations, p. 1241, § 2, effective July 1, 2004.

Editor's note:

In 2003, the former § 14-5-101 was relocated to § 14-5-102.

14-5-102. Definitions.

In this article:

"Child" means an individual, whether over or under the age of majority, who is or is alleged to be owed a duty of support by the individual's parent or who is or is alleged to be the beneficiary of a support order directed to the parent.

"Child support order" means a support order for a child, including a child who has attained the age of majority under the law of the issuing state or foreign country.

(2.5) "Convention" means the Convention on the International Recovery of Child Support and Other Forms of Family Maintenance, concluded at The Hague on November 23, 2007.

"Duty of support" means an obligation imposed or imposable by law to provide support for a child, spouse, or former spouse, including an unsatisfied obligation to provide support.

(3.3) "Foreign country" means a country, including a political subdivision thereof, other than the United States, that authorizes the issuance of support orders and:

(3.4) "Foreign support order" means a support order of a foreign tribunal.

(3.5) "Foreign tribunal" means a court, administrative agency, or quasi-judicial entity of a foreign country which is authorized to establish, enforce, or modify support orders or to determine parentage of a child. The term includes a competent authority under the Convention.

Which has been declared under the law of the United States to be a foreign reciprocating country;

Which has established a reciprocal arrangement for child support with this state as provided in section 14-5-308;

Which has enacted a law or established procedures for the issuance and enforcement of support orders which are substantially similar to the procedures under this article; or

In which the convention is in force with respect to the United States.

Request determination of the controlling child support order.

"Home state" means the state or foreign country in which a child lived with a parent or a person acting as parent for at least six consecutive months immediately preceding the time of filing of a petition or comparable pleading for support and, if a child is less than six months old, the state or foreign country in which the child lived from birth with any of them. A period of temporary absence of any of them is counted as part of the six-month or other period.

"Income" includes earnings or other periodic entitlements to money from any source and any other property subject to withholding for support under the law of this state.

"Income-withholding order" means an order or other legal process directed to an obligor's employer or other debtor, as defined by the income-withholding law of this state, to withhold support from the income of the obligor.

Repealed.

"Initiating tribunal" means the tribunal of a state or foreign country from which a petition or comparable pleading is forwarded or in which a petition or comparable pleading is filed for forwarding to another state or foreign country.

(8.5) "Issuing foreign country" means the foreign country in which a tribunal issues a support order or a judgment determining parentage of a child.

"Issuing state" means the state in which a tribunal issues a support order or a judgment determining parentage of a child.

"Issuing tribunal" means the tribunal of a state or foreign country that issues a support order or a judgment determining parentage of a child.

"Law" includes decisional and statutory law and rules and regulations having the force of law.

"Obligee" means:

(A) An individual to whom a duty of support is or is alleged to be owed or in whose favor a support order or a judgment determining parentage of a child has been issued;

(B) A foreign country, state, or political subdivision of a state to which the rights under a duty of support or support order have been assigned or which has independent claims based on financial assistance provided to an individual obligee in place of child support;

(C) An individual seeking a judgment determining parentage of the individual's child; or

(D) A person that is a creditor in a proceeding under part 7 of this article.

"Obligor" means an individual, or the estate of a decedent that:

(A) Owes or is alleged to owe a duty of support;

(B) Is alleged but has not been adjudicated to be a parent of a child;

(C) Is liable under a support order; or

(D) Is a debtor in a proceeding under part 7 of this article.

(13.5) "Outside this state" means a location in another state or a country other than the United States, whether or not the country is a foreign country.

"Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, public corporation, government, or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.

"Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

"Register" means to file in a tribunal of this state a support order or judgment determining parentage of a child issued in another state or a foreign country.

"Registering tribunal" means a tribunal in which a support order or judgment determining parentage of a child is registered.

"Responding state" means a state in which a petition or comparable pleading for support or to determine parentage of a child is filed or to which a petition or comparable pleading is forwarded for filing from another state or a foreign country.

"Responding tribunal" means the authorized tribunal in a responding state or foreign country.

"Spousal-support order" means a support order for a spouse or former spouse of the obligor.

"State" means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession under the jurisdiction of the United States. The term includes an Indian nation or tribe.

"Support enforcement agency" means a public official, governmental entity, or private agency authorized to:

(A) Seek enforcement of support orders or laws relating to the duty of support;

(B) Seek establishment or modification of child support;

(C) Request determination of parentage of a child;

(D) Attempt to locate obligors or their assets; or

"Support order" means a judgment, decree, order, decision, or directive, whether temporary, final, or subject to modification, issued in a state or foreign country for the benefit of a child, a spouse, or a former spouse, which provides for monetary support, health care, arrearages, retroactive support, or reimbursement for financial assistance provided to an individual obligee in place of child support. The term may include related costs and fees, interest, income withholding, automatic adjustment, reasonable attorney's fees, and other relief.

"Tribunal" means a court, administrative agency, or quasi-judicial entity authorized to establish, enforce, or modify support orders or to determine parentage of a child.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part amended with relocations, p. 1241, § 2, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2015:

(2), (4), (8), (9), (10), (12), (13), (14), (16) to (19), and (21) to (24) amended, (2.5), (3.3) to (3.5), (8.5), and (13.5) added, and (7) repealed, (HB 15-1198), ch. 173, p. 543, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

In 2003, this section was formerly numbered as § 14-5-101, and the former § 14-5-102 was relocated to § 14-5-103.

COMMENT

The terms defined in UIFSA receive a major makeover in the now-realized expectation that the Convention will enter into force in the United States at a future time. Six definitions of terms are completely new, sixteen existing definitions are amended to a greater or lesser degree, seven definitions remain basically untouched albeit six of these are renumbered, and one term is deleted because it no longer appears in the act.

Many crucial definitions continue to be left to local law. For example, the definitions provided by subsections (1) "child," and (2) "child-support order," refer to "the age of majority" without further elaboration. The exact age at which a child becomes an adult for different purposes is a matter for the law of each state or foreign country as is the age at which a parent's duty to furnish child support terminates. Similarly, a wide variety of other terms of art are implicitly left to state law. The new Convention provides a more explicit definition of "child" that is entirely consistent with the laws of all states.

There is a divergence of opinion among the several states regarding the appropriate age for termination of child support. The overwhelming number of states set ages 18 (legal adulthood for most purposes), or 19, or one of those two ages and high-school graduation, whichever comes later. Relatively few states have retained the formerly popular age of 21. And, some states extend the support obligation past age 21 if the person to be supported is engaged in higher education. Allegedly some support enforcement agencies and some tribunals have been reluctant to enforce an ongoing child support obligation past age 21, but under UIFSA it is the law of the issuing state or foreign country that makes the determination of the appropriate age for termination of support from an obligor. Because the order has been established with personal jurisdiction over the parties, it is fully enforceable under the terms of the act.

Under the terms of the Convention, the standard obligation of a responding tribunal to enforce a child-support order is for a person "under the age of 21 years."

See

Convention art. 2. Scope. However, a contracting nation may make a reservation to limit enforcement of a child- support order to "persons who have not attained the age of 18 years." Id. This possibility will not affect this act domestically because the United States does not intend to make such a reservation. Currently states will enforce another jurisdiction's order even if such an order could not have been obtained in the responding state because the child was over 18. There is no requirement to establish an order for a child over the age of 18 if that cannot be done under the local jurisdiction's law.

Subsection (3) "Convention," identifies the Hague Maintenance Convention, the basis on which UIFSA (2008) was drafted. The text of the Convention may be accessed on the website of the Hague Convention on Private International Law, www.hcch.net/index. As noted above, the Convention was the result of negotiations involving more than 70 foreign nations or, in some instances political subdivisions of a foreign nation, conducted in a series of meetings from May 2003 to November 2007.

Subsection (4) "Duty of support," means the legal obligation to provide support, whether or not that duty has been the subject of an order by a tribunal. This broad definition includes both prospective and retrospective obligations to the extent they are imposed by the relevant state law.

The definitions in subsections (5) "foreign country," (6) "foreign support order," and (7) "foreign tribunal," are all new to UIFSA, and must be read in conjunction with the prior and the new definition of "state," now in subsection (26). Formerly, under certain circumstances a foreign country or political subdivision was declared to be a "state." Defining a foreign country or a political subdivision thereof, e.g., a Canadian province, as a "state" may be traced back to 1968, where this approach first appeared in the Revised Uniform Reciprocal Enforcement of Support Act (RURESA). That fiction created confusion because a foreign support order is not entitled to full faith and credit. Indeed, such orders of the sister states of the United States were only relatively recently accorded that treatment after congressional action in 1994 with the advent of the Full Faith and Credit for Child Support Orders Act (FFCCSOA), 28. U.S.C. § 1738 B. Thus, constitutional analysis is not required for enforcement of foreign support orders; only state statutory issues are involved.

The term "foreign judgment" is used only once in UIFSA (1996) and (2001) in a context that clearly intends to mean "from a sister state." If an international construction is intended, the text in UIFSA (2001) is uniformly "foreign country or political subdivision." The new definitions in UIFSA (2008) are fine-tuned to avoid ambiguity in order to ensure that "foreign" is used strictly to identify international proceedings and orders.

Subsection (5) requires additional careful reading; under the act "foreign country" by no means includes all foreign nations.

See

Section 102(5)(A)-(D). Countries identified by three of the four subdivisions are reasonably ascertainable. The list of reciprocating countries that have negotiated an executive agreement with the United States as described in subdivision (5)(A), known as bilateral agreements, is found on the website of the federal Office of Child Support Enforcement (OCSE) at http://www. acf.hhs.gov/programs/cse/international/index.html.

The countries described in Section 102(5)(B) have entered into an agreement with the forum state, which presumptively is known to officials of that state. A combined list of all such agreements of all states is not readily available.

Countries subject to Section 102(5)(C) theoretically could require individualized determinations on a case-by-case basis. An alternative might be for each state to create an efficient method for identifying foreign countries whose laws are "substantially similar" to UIFSA. On the other hand, the "substantially similar" test to measure the laws of foreign nations has been around since 1968 without eliciting much controversy.

In the future, assuming that there will be a number of countries with the Convention in force with the United States under Section 102(5)(D), the list of those countries will be well publicized.

Finally, there are very many foreign nations that do not, and will not, fit any of the definitions of "foreign country" established in the act. At present, there are 192 member states in the United Nations. Recognition and enforcement of support orders from nations that do not meet the definition of "foreign country" may be enforceable under the doctrine of comity.

See

Section 104.

Subsections (6) "foreign support order," (7) "foreign tribunal," and (12) "issuing foreign country" set down parallel tracks for a foreign support order, foreign tribunal, and foreign issuing country throughout the act.

Subsection (17) "obligor," and subsection (16) "obligee," are denominated in the Convention as "debtor" and "creditor." The terms inherently contain the legal obligation to pay or receive support, and implicitly refer to the individuals with a duty to support a child. "Obligor" includes an individual who is alleged to owe a duty of support as well as a person whose obligation has previously been determined. The one-order system of UIFSA can succeed only if the respective obligations of support are adjusted as the physical possession of a child changes between parents or involves a third-party caretaker. This must be accomplished in the context of modification, and not by the creation of multiple orders attempting to reflect each changing custody scenario. Obviously this issue is of concern not only to interstate and international child-support orders, but applies to intrastate orders as well.

Subsection (18) "outside this state," requires careful reading. This phrase is used in the act when the application of the provision is to be as broad as possible. Rather than limit the application of certain provisions of the act to other states, foreign countries as defined in subsection (5), or even countries whose orders are entitled to comity under Section 104, all nations and political subdivisions are truly "outside this state." For example, that term is found in Sections 316 through 18, which allow a tribunal of this state to accept information or assistance from everywhere in the world (in the court's discretion as to its effect).

The definitions in subsections (23) "responding state," and (24) "responding tribunal," accommodate the direct filing of a petition under UIFSA without the intervention of an initiating tribunal. Both definitions acknowledge the possibility that there may be a responding state and a responding tribunal in a situation where there is no initiating tribunal. Under current practice, the initial application for services most often will be generated by a support enforcement agency or a central authority of a foreign country and sent to the appropriate support enforcement agency in the responding state.

As discussed above in connection with subsections (5) through (7), the amended definition in subsection (26) "state," eliminates the legal fiction that a foreign country can be a state of the United States, and clarifies and implements the purpose of the act to enforce an international support order under state law. In UIFSA (2008), the term clearly is intended to refer only to a state of the United States or to other designated political entities subject to federal law.

The vast bulk of child support establishment, enforcement, and modification in the United States is performed by the state Title IV-D agencies.

See

Part IV-D, Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 651 et seq. Subsection (27) "support enforcement agency," includes not only those entities, but also any other state or local governmental entities, or private agencies acting under contract with such agencies, charged with establishing or enforcing child support. A private agency falls within the definition of a support enforcement agency only as an outsource of a Title IV-D agency or specifically identified as such under Section 103.

Subsection (28) "support order" is another definition that requires more careful reading than might be immediately clear. Virtually every financial aspect of a support order regarding child support or spousal support is covered. Throughout the act "support order" means both "child support" and "spousal support." "Child support" is used when the provision applies only to support for a child. The single provision applicable solely to spousal support is Section 211. Other forms of support that might be classified as "family support," are not dealt with by UIFSA.

Subsection (29) "tribunal," takes into account that a number of states have delegated various aspects of child-support establishment and enforcement to quasi-judicial bodies and administrative agencies. The term accounts for the breadth of state variations in dealing with support orders. This usage is standard in the child-support enforcement community; private practitioners who, only rarely, are involved in such cases may still find the term unfamiliar.

14-5-103. State tribunals and support enforcement agency.

The court and the administrative agency are the tribunals of this state.

The county and state child support services agencies are the support enforcement agencies of this state.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part amended with relocations, p. 1243, § 2, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2015:

Entire section amended, (HB 15-1198), ch. 173, p. 546, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

In 2003, this section was formerly numbered as § 14-5-102, and the former § 14-5-103 was relocated to § 14-5-104.

COMMENT

Subsection (a) provides for the identification of the tribunal or tribunals to be charged with the application of this act.

Subsection (b) performs the same function for the support enforcement agency or agencies. By its terms it indicates the legislature may designate more than one entity as authorized to enforce a support order, including a private agency. To clarify, federal law and regulations require that each state designate a "single and separate organizational unit" as the state agency that is charged with administration of the state plan and is authorized, and funded under Title IV-D of the Social Security Act. Known throughout the United States as the as the "IV-D agency," it may delegate any of its functions to another state or local agency or may purchase services from any person or private agency. The IV-D agency, however, retains responsibility for ensuring compliance with the Title IV- D state plan. Moreover, by virtue of the receipt of a federal subsidy, the agency is subject to federal regulations. The legislature may also decide to provide services unrelated to, or not funded by the Title IV-D system. For example, the state legislature could identify (and fund) a private agency authorized to enforce a spousal-support order not involving child support, or could fund a public defender system to provide counsel for indigent defendants in IV-D cases.

14-5-104. Remedies cumulative.

Remedies provided by this article are cumulative and do not affect the availability of remedies under other law or the recognition of a foreign support order on the basis of comity.

This article does not:

Provide the exclusive method of establishing or enforcing a support order under the laws of this state; or

Grant a tribunal of this state jurisdiction to render judgment or issue an order relating to child custody or visitation in a proceeding under this article.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part amended with relocations, p. 1243, § 2, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2015:

(a) amended, (HB 15-1198), ch. 173, p. 546, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

In 2003, this section was formerly numbered as § 14-5-103.

COMMENT

The existence of procedures for interstate establishment, enforcement, or modification of support or a determination of parentage in UIFSA does not preclude the application of the general law of the forum. Even if the parents live in different states, for example, a petitioner may decide to file an original proceeding for child support (and most likely for other relief as well) directly in the state of residence of the respondent and proceed under that forum's generally applicable support law. In so doing, the out-of-state petitioner submits to the personal jurisdiction of the forum and, for the most part, is unaffected by UIFSA. Once a child-support order has been issued, this option is no longer available to interstate parties. Under UIFSA, a state may not permit a party to proceed to obtain a second support order; rather, in further litigation the tribunal must apply the act's provisions for enforcement of an existing order and limit modification to the strict standards of UIFSA.

This section facilitates the recognition and enforcement of a support order from a nation state that is entitled to have its orders recognized by comity, but is not a "foreign country" under Section 102(5). The insertion of the term "foreign support order" to replace "support order of a foreign country or political subdivision" in subsection (a) helps clarify application of "comity" for support enforcement cases. In UIFSA, four types of nation states are defined as "foreign countries": (1) Convention countries; (2) countries with bilateral agreements with the federal government; (3) countries with bilateral agreements with particular states; and (4) countries with similar support laws. However, orders of countries that do not fall within this definition may nevertheless be enforced under "comity". Applying comity to enforce a support order of a tribunal of another nation state intends courtesy and good will, and extends due regard for the legislative, executive, and judicial acts of another nation which is not a "foreign country" as defined in Section 102.

Although the determination by the United States Department of State that a foreign nation is a reciprocating country is binding on all states, recognition of a support order through comity is dependent on the law of each state. The reference to "remedies under other law" is intended to recognize the principle of comity as developed in the forum state by statutory or common law, rather than to create a substantive right independent of that law.

Subsection (b)(1) gives notice that UIFSA is not the only means for establishing or enforcing a support order with an interstate aspect. A potential child-support obligee may voluntarily submit to the jurisdiction of another state to seek the full range of desired relief under the law of that state using intrastate procedures, rather than resorting to the interstate procedure provided by UIFSA. A nonresident married parent may choose to file a proceeding in the forum state for dissolution of the marriage, including property division and spousal support, and in conjunction seek an order regarding child custody and visitation and child support. A parent may submit to the jurisdiction of another state for a determination of parentage and child support. A support order resulting from each of these scenarios implicates UIFSA. Invariably the issuing tribunal will have continuing, exclusive jurisdiction over its controlling child support or spousal-support order as provided by Sections 205, 207, and 211,

infra

, with all of the attendant application of the act to those orders. Likewise, the order or judgment of another state can be enforced without the necessity of registration under UIFSA by resort to other post-judgment enforcement remedies, such as lien, levy, execution, and filing claims in probate or bankruptcy actions.

On the other hand, subsection (b)(2) makes clear that jurisdiction to establish child custody and visitation orders is distinct from jurisdiction for child-support orders. For the former, jurisdiction generally rests on the child's connection with the state rather than personal jurisdiction over the respondent.

See

UCCJEA § 201; May v. Anderson, 345 U.S. 528 (1953) (Frankfurter, J., concurring). Under the Supreme Court's case law, jurisdiction to establish a child-support order requires personal jurisdiction over the respondent.

See

Kulko v. Superior Court, 436 U.S. 84 (1978). If the child-support order is sought under the authority of UIFSA, the most important aspect of this rule is that a child-support obligee utilizing the provisions of UIFSA to establish child support across state lines submits to jurisdiction for child support only, and does not submit to the jurisdiction of the responding state with regard to child custody or visitation.

14-5-105. Application of article to resident of foreign country and foreign support proceeding.

A tribunal of this state shall apply parts 1 through 6 of this article and, as applicable, part 7 of this article, to a support proceeding involving:

A foreign support order;

A foreign tribunal; or

An obligee, obligor, or child residing in a foreign country.

A tribunal of this state that is requested to recognize and enforce a support order on the basis of comity may apply the procedural and substantive provisions of parts 1 through 6.

Part 7 of this article applies only to a support proceeding under the Convention. In such a proceeding, if a provision of part 7 of this article is inconsistent with parts 1 through 6 of this article, part 7 of this article controls.

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire section added, (HB 15-1198), ch. 173, p. 546, § 4, effective July 1.

COMMENT

Four distinct entities are defined as a "foreign country" with tribunals that enter a "foreign support order."

See

Section 102(5). With regard to the three types of proceedings identified in subsection (a), all of the provisions in this act in Articles 1 through 6 apply. Note, however, that under subsection (c), only one of these, a country "in which the Convention is in force with respect to the United States,"

see

Section 102 (5)(D), will be subject to Article 7 as well as Articles 1 through 6. Thus, a support order from one of these countries may require special attention. After the Convention comes into force in the United States, a body of case law may develop if it becomes necessary to resolve unanticipated differences between this act and the Convention. As this extensive commentary and the many cross reference to provisions of the Convention indicate, significant efforts have been made to avoid any such conflicts.

Under subsection (b) a tribunal of this state may apply principles of comity if appropriate to recognize a support order from a foreign nation state that does not fit the definition of a "foreign country,"

see

Section 102(5)(A)-(D),

supra

.

Subsection (c) resolves that if terms of the Convention and the terms of this act, including Article 7, are in conflict, the provision of the Convention controls. With regard to the other three statutory definitions of a "foreign country," all the terms, this act in articles 1 through 6 control. After the Convention comes into force in the United States, a body of case law may develop to resolve unanticipated differences between this act and the Convention.